Utah statutes.
70A-2a-525.   Lessor's right to possession of goods.

(1)  If a lessor discovers the lessee to be insolvent, the lessor may refuse to deliver the goods.

(2)  After a default by the lessee under the lease contract of the type described in Section 70A-2a-523, or if agreed, after the default by the lessee, the lessor has the right to take possession of the goods.  If the lease contract so provides, the lessor may require the lessee to assemble the goods and make them available to the lessor at a place to be designated by the lessor which is reasonably convenient to both parties. Without removal, the lessor may render unusable any goods employed in trade or business, and may dispose of goods on the lessee's premises as provided in Section 70A-2a-527.

(3)  The lessor may proceed under Subsection (2) without judicial process if it can be done without breach of the peace or the lessor may proceed by action.

